District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.18

Conflicting laws and regulations repealed.

All laws or parts of laws and regulations promulgated thereunder in conflict with the provisions of this part shall be, and the same are hereby, repealed.

History

Sept. 19, 1950, 64 Stat. 866, ch. 953, § 18
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Cross References

Boards, commissions and committees, application of law, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2318.
1973 Ed., § 2-1818.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.